Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 1. Absentee Voting.

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 210(1)-210(7).

Validity of absentee voters’ laws. 97 ALR2d 218.

Construction and effect of absentee voters’ law. 97 ALR2d 257.

Sec. 15.20.010.
Persons who may vote absentee.

At any election a qualified voter may vote an absentee ballot for any reason.

History.

(§ 4.01 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 79 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 86 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.20.015.
Moving from house district just before election.

A person who meets all voter qualifications except the requirement in AS

15.05.010

(3) is qualified to vote by absentee ballot in the house district in which the person formerly resided if the person lived in that house district for at least 30 days immediately before changing residence, except that the person may vote only for

statewide ballot measures and questions;

candidates for federal or statewide offices;

candidates for the state senate if the voter’s former residence and present residence are in the same senate district; and

candidates for judicial retention if the voter’s former residence and present residence are in the same judicial district.

History.

(§ 2 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 43 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 45 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

The 2000 amendments to this section were harmonized by the revisor.

Sec. 15.20.020.
Provision for general administrative supervision.

The director shall provide general administrative supervision over the conduct of absentee voting. The director shall make available instructions to absentee voters regarding the procedure for absentee voting.

History.

(§ 4.02 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 80 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 46 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.20.030.
Preparation of ballots, envelopes, and other material.

The director shall provide ballots for use as absentee ballots in all districts. The director shall provide a secrecy sleeve in which the voter shall initially place the marked ballot, and shall provide an envelope with the prescribed voter’s certificate on it, in which the secrecy sleeve with ballot enclosed shall be placed. The director shall prescribe the form of and prepare the voter’s certificate, envelopes, and other material used in absentee voting. The voter’s certificate shall include a declaration, for use when required, that the voter is a qualified voter in all respects, a blank for the voter’s signature, a certification that the affiant properly executed the marking of the ballot and gave the voter’s identity, blanks for the attesting official or witness, and a place for recording the date the envelope was sealed and witnessed. The envelope with the voter’s certificate must include a notice that false statements made by the voter or by the attesting official or witness on the certificate are punishable by law.

History.

(§ 4.03 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 14 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 81 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 22 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.20.040.
Distribution of ballots, envelopes, and other material.

The director shall distribute the absentee ballots, envelopes, and other absentee voting material to the election supervisors for redistribution to absentee voting officials and absentee ballot stations established under AS

15.20.045(b)

before the date upon which a person may first apply for an absentee ballot in person.

History.

(§ 4.04 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 15 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 82 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.20.045.
Designation of absentee voting officials and stations.

The director or election supervisor may designate persons to act as absentee voting officials under AS

15.20.010

—

15.20.220

in areas where election supervisors do not have offices. Magistrates may, with the approval of the administrative director of the Alaska Court System, be designated under this section. At least 15 days before the election the director shall supply each absentee voting official with appropriate ballots.

The director may designate by regulation adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) locations at which absentee voting stations will be operated on or after the 15th day before an election up to and including the date of the election. The director shall supply absentee voting stations with ballots for all house districts in the state and shall designate absentee voting officials to serve at absentee voting stations.

In a municipality in which the division will not be operating an absentee voting station, the director may designate the municipal clerk as an absentee voting official for the limited purpose of distributing absentee ballots to qualified voters under AS

15.20.061(a)(1)

and qualified voters’ representatives under AS

15.20.072

. At least 15 days before the election, the director shall supply municipal clerks designated under this subsection with absentee ballots.

History.

(§ 19 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 83 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 44 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2001; am § 12 ch 73 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, added (c).

Sec. 15.20.048.
Absentee voting in offices of election supervisors. [Repealed, § 61 ch 2 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 15.20.050.
Requirement of full public notice.

The director shall give full public notice of the dates and manner of voting absentee and may select any means of communication permitted to be used in giving notice of the date and time of the general election. The director shall give notice under this section of the location of absentee voting stations at least 45 days before each election.

History.

(§ 4.05 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 85 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 2001)

Sec. 15.20.060.
Application in person or by a representative. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 15.20.061 and 15.20.062.]

Sec. 15.20.061.
Absentee voting in person.

A qualified voter may apply in person for an absentee ballot to the following election officials at the times specified:

to an absentee voting official on or after the 15th day before an election up to and including the date of the election;

to an election supervisor on or after the 15th day before an election up to and including the date of the election;

to an absentee voting official at an absentee voting station designated under AS

15.20.045(b)

on or after the 15th day before an election up to and including the date of the election;

to an absentee voting official in the precinct in which no volunteers can be located to serve on the election board on or after the 15th day before an election up to and including election day.

On receipt of an application in person for an absentee ballot and exhibition of proof of identification as required in AS

15.15.225

, the absentee voting official or election supervisor shall issue the ballot to the applicant.

On receipt of an absentee ballot in person, the voter shall proceed to mark the ballot in secret, to place the ballot in the secrecy sleeve, to place the secrecy sleeve in the envelope provided, and to sign the voter’s certificate on the envelope in the presence of the election official who shall sign as attesting official and date that signature. The election official shall then accept the ballot.

The election official may not accept a marked ballot that has been exhibited by an absentee voter with intent to influence other voters. If the absentee voter spoils a ballot, the voter may request and the election official shall provide another ballot up to a maximum of three. Exhibited or spoiled ballots shall be destroyed. The numbers of all ballots destroyed shall be noted on the ballot statement.

Each election official shall keep a record of the names and signatures of voters who cast absentee ballots before the election official and the dates on which the ballots were cast.

History.

(§ 86 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 23 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 45 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 47, 48 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 35 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

The amendment made by sec. 45, ch. 21, SLA 2000 was not given effect because the amendment made by sec. 47, ch. 82, SLA 2000 superceded it.

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.20.062.
Applications for ballot by personal representative. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 15.20.061 and 15.20.081.]

Sec. 15.20.064.
Early voting.

For 15 days before an election and on election day, a qualified voter who meets the requirements set out in this section may vote in locations designated by the director.

The election supervisor or other election official shall issue a ballot to the voter upon

exhibition of proof of identification as required in AS

15.15.225

;

verification that the voter’s residence address appearing on the official registration list is current; and

the voter’s signing the early voting register.

After the voter has marked the ballot, the voter shall place the ballot in the secrecy sleeve and inform the election supervisor or other election official. The voter shall deposit the ballot in the ballot box in the presence of the election supervisor or other election official unless the voter requests the election supervisor or other election official to deposit the ballot on the voter’s behalf. The tabulation of early voting ballots may not begin before 8:00 p.m. prevailing time on election day.

The director shall designate locations for early voting by June 1 of an election year.

History.

(§ 49 ch 82 SLA 2000; am §§ 4, 5 ch 154 SLA 2004; am § 16 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.20.065.
Applications for ballot by personal representative. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 15.20.061 and 15.20.081.]

Sec. 15.20.066.
Absentee voting by electronic transmission.

The director shall adopt regulations applicable to the delivery of absentee ballots by electronic transmission in a state election and to the use of electronic transmission absentee voting in a state election by qualified voters. The regulations must

require the voter to comply with the same time deadlines as for voting in person on or before the closing hour of the polls;

ensure the accuracy and, to the greatest degree possible, the integrity and secrecy of the ballot process.

An absentee ballot that is completed and returned by the voter by electronic transmission must

contain the following statement: “I understand that, by using electronic transmission to return my marked ballot, I am voluntarily waiving a portion of my right to a secret ballot to the extent necessary to process my ballot, but expect that my vote will be held as confidential as possible,” followed by the voter’s signature and date of signature; and

be accompanied by a statement executed under oath as to the voter’s identity; the statement under oath must be witnessed by

a commissioned or noncommissioned officer of the armed forces of the United States;

an official authorized by federal law or the law of the state in which the absentee ballot is cast to administer an oath; or

an individual who is 18 years of age or older.

History.

(§ 1 ch 9 SLA 1996; am § 17 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.20.070.
Application for ballot by mail. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 15.20.081.]

Sec. 15.20.071.
Absentee voting by personal representative. [Repealed, § 93 ch 82 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 15.20.072.
Special needs voting.

A qualified voter with a disability who, because of that disability, is unable to go to a polling place to vote may vote a special needs ballot.

The voter may, through a representative, request a special needs ballot from the following election officials at the times specified:

from an absentee voting official on or after the 15th day before an election, up to and including election day;

from an election supervisor on or after the 15th day before an election up to and including election day;

from an absentee voting official at an absentee voting station designated under AS

15.20.045(b)

on or after the 15th day before an election up to and including the date of the election; or

from a member of the precinct election board on election day.

If the request for a special needs ballot is made through a representative, the representative shall sign a register provided by an election official. The register must include the following information:

the representative’s name;

the representative’s residence and mailing address;

the representative’s social security number, voter identification number, or date of birth;

the name of the voter on whose behalf the representative is requesting a ballot and voting materials;

an oath that the representative

is receiving a ballot and voting materials on behalf of the voter;

will not vote the ballot for the voter;

will not coerce the voter;

will not divulge the vote cast by the voter; and

has been notified that unlawful interference with voting is punishable under AS

15.56.030

;

the representative’s signature.

The representative shall deliver the special needs ballot and other voting materials to the voter as soon as practicable. The voter shall mark the ballot in secret, place the ballot in the secrecy sleeve, and place the secrecy sleeve in the envelope provided. The voter shall provide the information on the envelope that would be required for absentee voting if the voter voted in person. The voter shall sign the voter’s certificate in the presence of the representative. The representative shall sign as attesting official and date the voter’s signature.

The representative shall deliver the ballot and voter certificate to an election official not later than 8:00 p.m. Alaska time on election day.

If a qualified voter’s disability precludes the voter from performing any of the requirements of (d) of this section, the representative may perform those requirements, except making the voting decision, on the voter’s behalf.

The voter’s employer, an agent of the voter’s employer, or an officer or agent of the voter’s union may not act as a representative for the voter. A candidate for office at an election may not act as a representative for a voter in the election.

History.

(§ 50 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 35 SLA 2001; am § 14 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Sec. 15.20.080.
Date for application in person. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 15.20.061.]

Sec. 15.20.081.
Absentee voting in general; applying for absentee ballot by mail or electronic transmission.

A qualified voter may apply in person, by mail, or by facsimile, scanning, or other electronic transmission to the director for an absentee ballot under this section. Another individual may apply for an absentee ballot on behalf of a qualified voter if that individual is designated to act on behalf of the voter in a written general power of attorney or a written special power of attorney that authorizes the other individual to apply for an absentee ballot on behalf of the voter. The application must include the address or, if the application requests delivery of an absentee ballot by electronic transmission, the telephone electronic transmission number, to which the absentee ballot is to be returned, the applicant’s full Alaska residence address, and the applicant’s signature. However, a person residing outside the United States and applying to vote absentee in federal elections in accordance with AS

15.05.011

need not include an Alaska residence address in the application. A person may supply to a voter an absentee ballot application form with a political party or group affiliation indicated only if the voter is already registered as affiliated with the political party or group indicated. The application must be made on a form prescribed or approved by the director. The voter or registration official shall submit the application directly to the division of elections. For purposes of this subsection, “directly to the division of elections” means that an application may not be submitted to any intermediary that could control or delay the submission of the application to the division or gather data on the applicant from the application form. However, nothing in this subsection is intended to prohibit a voter from giving a completed absentee ballot application to a friend, relative, or associate for transfer to the United States Postal Service or a private commercial delivery service for delivery to the division.

An application requesting delivery of an absentee ballot to the applicant by mail must be received by the division of elections not less than 10 days before the election for which the absentee ballot is sought. An application for an absentee ballot for a state election from a qualified voter requesting delivery of an absentee ballot to the applicant by electronic transmission must be received by the division of elections not later than 5:00 p.m. Alaska time on the day before the election for which the absentee ballot is sought. An absentee ballot application submitted by mail under this section must permit the person to register to vote under AS

15.07.070

and to request an absentee ballot for each state election held within that calendar year for which the voter is eligible to vote. An absentee ballot application submitted by electronic transmission under this section may not include a provision that permits a person to register to vote under AS

15.07.070

.

After receipt of an application, the director shall send the absentee ballot and other absentee voting material to the applicant by the most expeditious mail service. However, if the application requests that an absentee ballot for a state election be sent by electronic transmission, the director shall send the absentee ballot and other absentee voting material to the applicant by electronic transmission. Except as provided in (k) of this section, the absentee ballot and other absentee voting material shall be sent as soon as they are ready for distribution. If the absentee ballot and other absentee voting material are mailed to the applicant, the return envelope sent with the ballot and other materials shall be addressed to the election supervisor in the district in which the voter is a resident.

Upon receipt of an absentee ballot by mail, the voter, in the presence of a notary public, commissioned officer of the armed forces including the National Guard, district judge or magistrate, United States postal official, registration official, or other person qualified to administer oaths, may proceed to mark the ballot in secret, to place the ballot in the secrecy sleeve, to place the secrecy sleeve in the envelope provided, and to sign the voter’s certificate on the envelope in the presence of an official listed in this subsection who shall sign as attesting official and shall date the signature. If none of the officials listed in this subsection is reasonably accessible, an absentee voter shall sign the voter’s certificate in the presence of an individual who is 18 years of age or older, who shall sign as a witness and attest to the date on which the voter signed the certificate in the individual’s presence, and, in addition, the voter shall certify, as prescribed in AS

09.63.020

, under penalty of perjury, that the statements in the voter’s certification are true.

An absentee ballot must be marked on or before the date of the election. Except as provided in (h) of this section, a voter who returns the absentee ballot by mail, whether provided to the voter by mail or by electronic transmission, shall use a mail service at least equal to first class and mail the ballot not later than the day of the election to the election supervisor for the house district in which the voter seeks to vote. Except as provided in AS

15.20.480

, the ballot may not be counted unless it is received by the close of business on the 10th day after the election. If the ballot is postmarked, it must be postmarked on or before election day. After the day of the election, ballots may not be accepted unless received by mail.

The director shall require a voter casting an absentee ballot by mail to provide proof of identification or other information to aid in the establishment of the voter’s identity as prescribed by regulations adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). If the voter is a first-time voter who initially registered by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

and has not met the identification requirements set out in AS

15.07.060

, the voter must provide one of the following forms of proof of identification:

a copy of a driver’s license, state identification card, current and valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or hunting or fishing license; or

a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, government check, or other government document; an item provided under this paragraph must show the name and current address of the voter.

The director shall maintain a record of the name of each voter to whom an absentee ballot is sent under this section. The record must list the date on which the ballot is mailed or provided by electronic transmission and the date on which the ballot is received by the election supervisor and the dates on which the ballot was executed and postmarked.

Except as provided in AS

15.20.480

, an absentee ballot returned by mail from outside the United States or from an overseas voter qualifying under AS

15.05.011

that has been marked and mailed not later than election day may not be counted unless the ballot is received by the election supervisor not later than the close of business on the

10th day following a primary election or special primary election under AS

15.40.140

; or

15th day following a general election or special election, other than a special primary election described in (1) of this subsection.

[Repealed, § 44 ch 73 SLA 2013.]

The director shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) specifying the information required to be included on an absentee ballot application form. The regulations must require that an absentee ballot application form

contain only that information required under regulations adopted by the director;

conceal the personal information of the individual requesting delivery of an absentee ballot while the application is in the custody of the United States Postal Service or other person delivering the application to the division;

specify that the form is to be returned by the voter directly to the division, and not to another person providing the form; and

if not prepared by the division, be approved by the director before distribution to the public.

In accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1973ff-1(a)(8)(A), if an application is received at least 45 days before an election and is from an absent uniformed services voter or an overseas voter, the director shall send an absentee ballot and other voting material to the applicant not later than 45 days before the election.

If an application is received at least 45 days before an election and is from a voter who notifies the director in writing that the voter expects to be living, working, or traveling outside the United States at the time of the election or expects to be living, working, or traveling in a remote area of the state where distance, terrain, or other natural conditions deny the voter reasonable access to a polling place at the time of the election, the director shall send an absentee ballot and other voting material to the applicant not later than 45 days before the election.

History.

(§ 87 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 63 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 85 SLA 1986; am §§ 8 — 11 ch 67 SLA 1989; am §§ 2 — 6 ch 9 SLA 1996; am § 25 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 63 SLA 1998; am § 46 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 15, 16 ch 113 SLA 2003; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 4 SLA 2006; am §§ 13 — 15, 44 ch 73 SLA 2013; §§ 28 and 29, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (c), substituted “Except as provided in (k) of this section, the” for “The” at the beginning of the third sentence; added (h)(1), rewrote (h)(2), which read “15th day following the election”; repealed (i); added (k) and (

l

).

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (a), deleted the sixth and seventh sentences,
which read, “Only the voter or the individual designated by the voter in a written power of attorney under this subsection may mark the voter’s choice of primary ballot on an application. A person supplying an absentee ballot application form may not design or mark the application in a manner that suggests choice of one ballot over another, except that ballot choices may be listed on an application as authorized by the division.”; in (h)(1) and (2), substituted “special primary election” for “special election”, and in (h)(2) deleted “, special runoff election,” following “general election”.

Editor's notes. —

This section refers to 42 U.S.C. 1973ff-1, which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 20302, by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Sec. 15.20.082.
Absentee voting by mail from outside the United States or in a remote area; special absentee ballots. [Repealed, § 44 ch 73 SLA 2013.]

Secs. 15.20.090 — 15.20.150.
Dates for and procedure on applications; casting votes. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 15.20.160.
Fee prohibited.

A person may not receive a fee from the voter for attesting to any voter’s certificate required in voting absentee.

History.

(§ 4.16 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.20.170.
Disposition of ballots.

Each absentee voting official shall transmit the dated envelopes containing the marked ballots by the most expeditious mail service to the election supervisor for the district.
Upon receipt of the absentee ballots the election supervisor shall stamp on the envelope the date on which the ballot is received.

History.

(§ 4.17 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 18 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 23 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 88 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.20.180.
Names of absentee voters to be made available.

The election supervisors and election officials shall have available for public inspection the names and addresses of persons who voted absentee.

History.

(§ 4.18 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 19 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 24 ch 197 SLA 1975)

Sec. 15.20.190.
Appointment, duties, and compensation of district counting boards.

Thirty days before the date of an election, the election supervisors shall appoint, in the same manner provided for the appointment of election officials prescribed in AS 15.10, district absentee ballot counting boards and district questioned ballot counting boards, each composed of at least four members. At least one member of each board must be a member of the same political party or political group with the largest number of registered voters at the time of the preceding gubernatorial election, and at least one member of each board must be a member of the political party or political group with the second largest number of registered voters at the time of the preceding gubernatorial election. The district boards shall assist the election supervisors in counting the absentee and questioned ballots and shall receive the same compensation paid election officials under AS

15.15.380

.

[Repealed, § 92 ch 82 SLA 2000.]

History.

(§ 4.19 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 20 ch 228 SLA 1968; am § 89 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 26 ch 86 SLA 1996; am §§ 52, 92 ch 82 SLA 2000; § 30, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the second sentence of (a), which read, “At least one member of each board must be a member of the same political party of which the governor is a member, and at least one member of each board must be a member of the political party whose candidate for governor received the second largest number of votes in the preceding gubernatorial election.”

Sec. 15.20.200.
Time of district canvass and for counting absentee ballots. [Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 15.20.201.]

Sec. 15.20.201.
Time of district absentee ballot counting review.

No less than seven days preceding the day of election, the election supervisor, in the presence and with the assistance of the district absentee ballot counting board, shall review all voter certificates of absentee ballots received by that date. The review of absentee ballots shall continue at times designated by the election supervisor until completed.

Counting of absentee ballots that have been reviewed shall begin at 8:00 p.m., local time, on the day of the election at places designated by each election supervisor and shall continue until all absentee ballots reviewed and eligible for counting have been counted. The counting teams shall report the count of absentee ballots to the district absentee ballot counting board. An election supervisor or an election official may not count absentee ballots before 8:00 p.m., local time, on the day of the election. Counting of the absentee ballots shall continue at times designated by the election supervisor until all absentee ballots are counted.

Not later than the 15th day following the day of the election, the district absentee ballot counting board shall certify the absentee ballot review.

Absentee ballots received in the office of an election supervisor after the completion of the district absentee ballot counting review shall be forwarded immediately to the director by the most expeditious service.

History.

(§ 90 ch 100 SLA 1980; am §§ 13 — 15 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 27 ch 86 SLA 1996)

Sec. 15.20.203.
Procedure for district absentee ballot counting review.

The district absentee ballot counting board shall examine each absentee ballot envelope and shall determine whether the absentee voter is qualified to vote at the election and whether the absentee ballot has been properly cast.

An absentee ballot may not be counted if

the voter has failed to properly execute the certificate;

an official or the witnesses authorized by law to attest the voter’s certificate fail to execute the certificate, except that an absentee ballot cast in person and accepted by an absentee voting official or election supervisor may be counted despite failure of the absentee voting official or election supervisor to properly sign and date the voter’s certificate as attesting official as required under AS

15.20.061(c)

;

the ballot is not attested on or before the date of the election;

the ballot, if postmarked, is not postmarked on or before the date of the election;

after the day of election, the ballot was delivered by a means other than mail; or

the voter voted

in person and is a

first-time voter who initially registered by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

, has not provided the identification required by AS

15.15.225(a)

, was not eligible for waiver of the identification requirement under AS

15.15.225(b)

, and has not provided the identifiers required in AS

15.07.060(a)(2)

and (3) that can be verified through state agency records described in AS

15.07.055(e)

; or

voter other than one described in (i) of this subparagraph, did not provide identification described in AS

15.15.225(a)

, was not personally known by the election official, and has not provided the identifiers required in AS

15.07.060(a)(2)

and (3); or

by mail or electronic transmission, is a first-time voter who initially registered by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS

15.07.050

to vote, has not met the identification requirements set out in AS

15.07.060

, and does not submit with the ballot a copy of a

driver’s license, state identification card, current and valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or hunting or fishing license; or

current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, government check, or other government document; an item described in this sub-subparagraph must show the name and current address of the voter.

Any person present at the district absentee ballot counting review may challenge the name of an absentee voter when read from the voter’s certificate on the envelope if the person has good reason to suspect that the challenged voter is not qualified to vote, is disqualified, or has voted at the same election. The person making the challenge shall specify the basis of the challenge in writing. The district absentee ballot counting board by majority vote may refuse to accept and count the absentee ballot of a person properly challenged on grounds listed in (b) of this section.

The election supervisor shall place all rejected absentee ballots in a separate envelope with the statements of challenge. The envelope shall be labeled “rejected absentee ballots” and shall be forwarded to the director with the election certificates and other returns.

If an absentee ballot is not rejected, the envelope shall be opened and the secrecy sleeve containing the absentee ballot shall be placed in a container and mixed with other secrecy sleeves.

The secrecy sleeves shall be drawn from the container, the absentee ballots shall be removed from the secrecy sleeves, and the absentee ballots counted at the times specified in AS

15.20.201

and according to the rules for determining properly marked ballots in AS

15.15.360

.

Upon completion of the absentee ballot review, the election supervisor shall prepare an election certificate for execution by the district absentee ballot counting board and shall forward the original certificate and other returns to the director no later than the 16th day following the election.

The director shall prepare and mail to each absentee voter whose absentee ballot was rejected under this section a summary of the reason that the challenge to the absentee ballot was upheld and the absentee ballot was rejected.

The director shall mail the materials described in (h) of this section to the voter not later than

10 days after completion of the review of ballots by the state review board for a primary election or a special primary election under AS

15.40.140

;

60 days after certification of the results of a general election or special election other than a special primary election described in (1) of this subsection.

The director shall make available through a free access system to each absentee voter a system to check to see whether the voter’s ballot was counted and, if not counted, the reason why the ballot was not counted. The director shall make this information available through the free access system not less than

10 days after certification of the results of a primary election or a special primary election under AS

15.40.140

; and

30 days after certification of the results of a general or special election, other than a special primary election described in (1) of this subsection.

History.

(§ 90 ch 100 SLA 1980; am §§ 16, 17 ch 85 SLA 1986; am §§ 28 — 32 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2001; am §§ 18, 19 ch 113 SLA 2003; am §§ 16, 17 ch 73 SLA 2013; §§ 31 and 32, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in (i)(1), added “, or for a special election under AS

15.40.140

that is followed by a special runoff election”, rewrote (i)(2), which read “60 days after certification of the results of a general or special election”; in (j), added the (1) and (2) designations; in (j)(1), added “, or a special election under AS

15.40.140

that is followed by a special runoff election;”, rewrote (j)(2), which read “not less than 30 days after certification of the results of a general or special election”.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, in (i)(1), substituted “or a special primary election under AS

15.40.140

” for “, or for a special election under AS

15.40.140

that is followed by a special runoff election”, in (i)(2), substituted “or special election other than a special runoff election” for “, special runoff election, or special election other than a special election described in (1)”; in (j)(1) and (2), substituted “special primary election” for “special election” and in (j)(1), deleted “that is followed by a special runoff election” following AS 15.40.140”, and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 15.20.205.
Time of district questioned ballot counting review.

On the second day following the day of the election, the election supervisor or the supervisor’s designee, in the presence and with the assistance of the district questioned ballot counting board, shall review all voter certificates of questioned ballots received by that date. The review of questioned ballots shall continue at times designated by the election supervisor until completed.

Counting of questioned ballots which have been reviewed shall begin on the third day following the day of the election and shall continue at times designated by the election supervisor until all questioned ballots reviewed and eligible for counting have been counted. The counting teams shall report the count to the district questioned ballot counting board.

The district questioned ballot counting board may certify the questioned ballot totals as soon as the count is completed but no later than the 15th day following the election.

Questioned ballots received after certification of the count shall be forwarded immediately to the director by the most expeditious service.

History.

(§ 90 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 18 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 53 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.